Hawaii statutes.
§451J-11 Denial, revocation, or suspension
of license. (a) The department shall deny, revoke, condition, or suspend
a license granted pursuant to this chapter on the following grounds:

(1) Conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction
of a crime which the department has determined, by rules adopted pursuant to
chapter 91, to be of a nature that renders the person convicted unfit to
practice marriage and family therapy;

(2) Failing to report in writing to the director any
disciplinary decision related to the provision of mental health services issued
against the licensee or the applicant in any jurisdiction within thirty days of
the disciplinary decision, or within thirty days of licensure;

(3) Violation of recognized ethical standards for
marriage and family therapists as set by the association;

(4) Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining or
renewing a license, including making a false certification of compliance with
the continuing education requirement set forth in section 451J-10;

(5) Revocation, suspension, or other disciplinary
action by any state or federal agency against a licensee or applicant for any
reason provided under this section; or

(6) Other just and sufficient cause that renders a
person unfit to practice marriage and family therapy.

(b) Any licensee who violates this section may
also be fined not more than $1,000 per violation. [L 1998, c 159, pt of §2; am
L 2014, c 28, §4]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next